Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-833
Legislative intent.

The intent of the Legislature is to increase access to mental health and substance use treatment and expand capacity for comprehensive, holistic services, respond to local needs, incorporate evidence-based practices, and establish care coordination as a linchpin for service delivery including effective community partnerships with law enforcement, schools, hospitals, primary care providers, and public and private service organizations to improve care, reduce recidivism, and address health disparities.

Laws 2023, LB276, § 3.